Maine, session 132, LD278.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §4401, sub-§9, as amended by PL 2023, c. 613, Pt. B, §5, is
further amended to read:
9. Tobacco products. "Tobacco products" means any products that are made from or
derived from tobacco, or that contain nicotine, whether natural or artificial, including, but
not limited to, cigars, including premium cigars; cheroots; stogies; electronic smoking
devices and liquids used in electronic smoking devices whether or not they contain
nicotine; periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed and other smoking
tobacco; snuff; snuff flour; snus; cavendish; plug and twist tobacco; finecut and other
chewing tobaccos; shorts; refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco; and
other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner as to be intended for human
consumption or as is likely to be consumed, whether smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed,
dissolved, inhaled or ingested by any other means.